New Jersey, session 221, S593.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2C:29-6 is amended to read as follows: 2C:29-6.  a.  Escape implements. (1) A person commits an offense if he knowingly and unlawfully introduces within an institution for commitment of persons under N.J.S.2C:4-8 or a detention facility, or knowingly and unlawfully provides an inmate with any weapon, tool, instrument, document or other thing which may be useful for escape.  The offense is a crime of the second degree and shall be punished by a minimum term of imprisonment, which shall be fixed at no less than three years if the item is a weapon as defined by [N.J.S.2C:39-1(r)] subsection r. of N.J.S.2C:39-1.  Otherwise, it is a crime of the third degree. (2)   An inmate of an institution or facility defined by paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section commits an offense if he knowingly and unlawfully procures, makes, or otherwise provides himself with, or has in his possession, any such implement of escape.  The offense is a crime of the second degree and shall be punished by a minimum term of imprisonment, which shall be fixed at no less than [three] five years [if the item is a weapon as defined by N.J.S. 2C:39-1(r).  Otherwise it is a crime of the third degree]. Unlawfully means surreptitiously or contrary to law, regulation or order of the detaining authority. b.   Other contraband.  A person commits a [petty disorderly persons offense] crime of the third degree if he provides an inmate with any other thing which the actor knows or should know it is unlawful for the inmate to possess. (cf: P.L.1983, c.87, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.